Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2804
Subpoena; duty of witness; noncompliance; penalty.

It shall be the duty of the witness or witnesses thus served with subpoena to attend and give evidence before the judge or court issuing the same, on pain of being guilty of a contempt, in which event he or they shall be proceeded against accordingly by the judge or court.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 356, p. 805;

R.S.1913, § 9250;

C.S.1922, § 10279;

C.S.1929, § 29-2804;

R.S.1943, § 29-2804.